New York, session 2025-2026, S6043.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 213 of the elder law is amended by 2 adding a new paragraph (n) to read as follows: 3 (n) A report on individuals who are the primary caregiver for an older 4 adult, including the number of individuals who are primary caregivers 5 for an older adult, the average age of a primary caregiver, the cost to 6 an individual to provide care to an older adult, and the economic value 7 and savings to the state of such individual's services. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01861-01-5